bg-BG: Предназначение на ветроупорния екран: Заслон за къмпинг/плаж; Параван за уединение; Ветробран за котлон/готвене; Друго
sl-SI: Namen vetrobrana: Zavetje za kampiranje/plažo; Zaslon za zasebnost; Zaščita pred vetrom za kuhalnik/kuhanje; Drugo
fi: Tuulisuojuksen tarkoitus: Retkeily-/rantasuoja; Näkösuoja; Keittimen/ruoanlaiton tuulisuoja; Muu
nb: Formålet med vindskjermen: Camping-/strandskjerm; Innsynsskjerm; Vindskjerm for komfyr/matlaging; Annet
el: Σκοπός ανεμοφράκτη: Σκίαστρο κάμπινγκ/παραλίας; Προστατευτικό ιδιωτικότητας; Αντιανεμικό εστίας/μαγειρέματος; Άλλο
en: Windbreak purpose: Camping/beach shelter; Privacy screen; Stove/cooking windshield; Other
sv: Syfte med vindskydd: Camping-/strandskydd; Insynsskydd; Vindskydd för friluftskök; Övrigt
fr: Usage du brise-vent: Abri de camping/plage; Brise-vue; Pare-vent pour réchaud/cuisson; Autre
lt-LT: Vėjo užtvaros paskirtis: Kempingo / paplūdimio pastogė; Privatumo širma; Viryklės / maisto ruošimo užuovėja; Kita
es: Propósito del cortavientos: Refugio de camping/playa; Pantalla de privacidad; Cortavientos para cocina/estufa; Otro
it: Scopo del frangivento: Tenda da campeggio/spiaggia; Schermo per la privacy; Paravento per fornello/cucina; Altro
vi: Mục đích chắn gió: Chỗ trú cắm trại/bãi biển; Tấm che riêng tư; Kính chắn gió cho bếp/khi nấu ăn; Khác
pt-PT: Finalidade do corta-vento: Abrigo de campismo/praia; Resguardo de privacidade; Para-vento de fogão/cozinha; Outro
zh-CN: 防风林用途: 露营/海滩遮挡; 隐私屏风; 炉具/烹饪挡风板; 其他
cs: Účel větrolamu: Přístřešek pro kempování / na pláž; Zástěna pro soukromí; Závětří k vařiči/na vaření; Jiné
nl: Windscherm doel: Camping-/strandtent; Privacyscherm; Windscherm voor kooktoestel; Overige
zh-TW: 擋風牆用途: 露營/海灘遮蔽處; 隱私屏風; 火爐/烹飪擋風板; 其他
da: Formål med læskærm: Camping-/strandlæhegn; Afskærmning; Læskærm til komfur/madlavning; Andet
hu: Szélfogó célja: Kemping / Strandsátor; Belátásgátló; Gázfőző / Főző szélvédő; Egyéb
hr-HR: Namjena vjetrobranskog pojasa: Sklonište za kampiranje / plažu; Zaslon za privatnost; Zaštita od vjetra za kuhanje / štednjak; Ostalo
pl: Przeznaczenie parawanu: Osłona kempingowa/plażowa; Osłona zapewniająca prywatność; Osłona kuchenki/do gotowania; Inny
ro-RO: Scopul paravântului: Adăpost pentru camping/plajă; Paravan de intimitate; Paravânt pentru aragaz/gătit; Altele
sk-SK: Účel vetrolamu: Kempingový/plážový prístrešok; Zástena na súkromie; Závetrie na varič; Iné
ja: 防風林の用途: キャンプ/ビーチ用シェルター; プライバシースクリーン; ストーブ/調理用風防; その他
th: จุดประสงค์ในการป้องกันลม: ที่กำบังสำหรับตั้งแคมป์/ชายหาด; ฉากกั้นเพื่อความเป็นส่วนตัว; ที่บังลมเตา/ทำอาหาร; อื่นๆ
ru: Назначение ветрозащиты: Укрытие для кемпинга / пляжа; Ширма для уединения; Ветрозащита для плиты / готовки; Другое
pt-BR: Quebra-vento finalidade: Tenda para camping/praia; Tela de privacidade; Corta-vento para fogareiro; Outro
de: Verwendungszweck des Windschutzes: Camping-/Strandunterstand; Sichtschutz; Windschutz für Kocher; Sonstige
ko: 바람막이 용도: 캠핑/해변용 쉘터; 사생활 보호 스크린; 스토브/요리용 바람막이; 기타
tr: Rüzgâr kırıcı kullanım amacı: Kamp/plaj barınağı; Gizlilik paravanı; Ocak/pişirme rüzgarlığı; Diğer